dictionaries/cs/index.aff
SFX K Y 85
SFX K   0           te         [eě]
SFX K   0           ti         [eě]
SFX K   0           tem        [eě]
SFX K   e           ata        e
SFX K   e           at         e
SFX K   e           atům       e
SFX K   e           atech      e
SFX K   e           aty        e
SFX K   ě           ata        [^dnt]ě
SFX K   ě           at         [^dnt]ě
SFX K   ě           atům       [^dnt]ě
SFX K   ě           atech      [^dnt]ě
SFX K   ě           aty        [^dnt]ě
SFX K   ně          ňata       ně
SFX K   ně          ňat        ně
SFX K   ně          ňatům      ně
SFX K   ně          ňatech     ně
SFX K   ně          ňaty       ně
SFX K   tě          ťata       tě
SFX K   tě          ťat        tě
SFX K   tě          ťatům      tě
SFX K   tě          ťatech     tě
SFX K   tě          ťaty       tě
SFX K   dě          ďata       dě
SFX K   dě          ďat        dě
SFX K   dě          ďatům      dě
SFX K   dě          ďatech     dě
SFX K   dě          ďaty       dě
SFX K   0           tu         a
SFX K   0           tem        a
SFX K   0           ta         a
SFX K   0           t          a
SFX K   0           tům        a
SFX K   0           tech       a
SFX K   0           ty         a
SFX K   0           i          [^aeěíýďňťs]
SFX K   0           í          [^aeěíýďňťs]
SFX K   0           em         [^aeěíýďňťsmcpšv]
SFX K   0           ech        [^aeěíýďňťsmcpšv]
SFX K   0           mi         [^aeěíýďňťsmcv]
SFX K   0           ích        [pšv]
SFX K   0           ím         [pšv]
SFX K   0           ích        oc
SFX K   0           ím         oc
SFX K   0           ech        moc
SFX K   0           em         moc
SFX K   0           ech        [^o]c
SFX K   0           em         [^o]c
SFX K   0           mi         ěc
SFX K   0           emi        [^ě]c
SFX K   ď           di         ď
SFX K   ď           dí         ď
SFX K   ď           dím        ď
SFX K   ď           dích       ď
SFX K   ď           děmi       [^eěu]ď
SFX K   0           mi         [eěu]ď
SFX K   ť           ti         ť
SFX K   ť           tí         ť
SFX K   ť           tím        ť
SFX K   ť           tích       ť
SFX K   ť           těmi       [^ě]ť
SFX K   0           mi         ěť
SFX K   0           ěmi        v
SFX K   es          si         es
SFX K   es          sí         es
SFX K   es          sím        es
SFX K   es          sích       es
SFX K   es          semi       es
SFX K   0           i          [^e]s
SFX K   0           í          [^e]s
SFX K   0           ím         [^e]s
SFX K   0           ích        [^e]s
SFX K   0           mi         [^e]s
SFX K   ý           ost        ý
SFX K   ý           osti       ý
SFX K   ý           ostí       ý
SFX K   ý           ostem      ý
SFX K   ý           ostech     ý
SFX K   ý           ostmi      ý
SFX K   í           ost        í
SFX K   í           osti       í
SFX K   í           ostí       í
SFX K   í           ostem      í
SFX K   í           ostech     í
SFX K   í           ostmi      í

SFX Y Y 145
SFX Y   ý           á          ý
SFX Y   ý           é          ý
SFX Y   ý           ého        ý
SFX Y   ý           ému        ý
SFX Y   ý           ém         ý
SFX Y   0           m          ý
SFX Y   ý           ou         ý
SFX Y   á           é          á
SFX Y   á           ou         á
SFX Y   á           ých        á
SFX Y   á           ým         á
SFX Y   á           ými        á
SFX Y   0           ho         é
SFX Y   0           mu         é
SFX Y   0           m          é
SFX Y   é           ým         é
SFX Y   é           á          é
SFX Y   é           ých        é
SFX Y   é           ými        é
SFX Y   ý           í          [^rhk]ý
SFX Y   rý          ří         rý
SFX Y   hý          zí         [^c]hý
SFX Y   chý         ší         chý
SFX Y   ký          cí         [^scč]ký
SFX Y   ský         ští        ský
SFX Y   cký         čtí        cký
SFX Y   ký          cí         čký
SFX Y   0           ch         ý
SFX Y   0           mi         ý
SFX Y   0           ma         ý
SFX Y   0           ho         í
SFX Y   0           mu         í
SFX Y   0           m          í
SFX Y   0           ch         í
SFX Y   0           mi         í
SFX Y   0           ma         í
SFX Y   oj          ého        [io]j
SFX Y   oj          ému        [io]j
SFX Y   oj          ý          [io]j
SFX Y   oj          ém         [io]j
SFX Y   oj          ým         [io]j
SFX Y   skoj        ští        sk[io]j
SFX Y   ckoj        čtí        ck[io]j
SFX Y   koj         cí         [^sc]k[io]j
SFX Y   oj          í          [^k][io]j
SFX Y   oj          ých        [io]j
SFX Y   oj          é          [io]j
SFX Y   oj          ými        [io]j
SFX Y   0           ho         [iy]
SFX Y   0           mu         [iy]
SFX Y   0           m          [iy]
SFX Y   0           ové        [iy]
SFX Y   0           ch         [iy]
SFX Y   0           ů          [iy]
SFX Y   0           ům         [iy]
SFX Y   0           e          [iy]
SFX Y   0           ích        [iy]
SFX Y   0           mi         [iy]
SFX Y   0           i          [iy]
SFX Y   0           ho         e
SFX Y   0           mu         e
SFX Y   0           m          e
SFX Y   e           ové        e
SFX Y   e           ů          e
SFX Y   e           ům         e
SFX Y   e           y          e
SFX Y   0           ch         e
SFX Y   0           ho         ě
SFX Y   0           mu         ě
SFX Y   0           m          ě
SFX Y   ně          ňové       ně
SFX Y   ně          ňů         ně
SFX Y   ně          ňům        ně
SFX Y   ě           i          ě
SFX Y   ě           ích        ě
SFX Y   ův          ova        ův
SFX Y   ův          ovu        ův
SFX Y   ův          ově        ův
SFX Y   ův          ovým       ův
SFX Y   ův          ovi        ův
SFX Y   ův          ovy        ův
SFX Y   ův          ovo        ův
SFX Y   ův          ovou       ův
SFX Y   ův          ových      ův
SFX Y   ův          ovými      ův
SFX Y   ův          ovýma      ův
SFX Y   0           a          in
SFX Y   0           u          in
SFX Y   0           ě          in
SFX Y   0           ým         in
SFX Y   0           i          in
SFX Y   0           y          in
SFX Y   0           ou         in
SFX Y   0           ých        in
SFX Y   0           ými        in
SFX Y   0           o          in
SFX Y   0           ýma        in
SFX Y   en          oho        en
SFX Y   en          omu        en
SFX Y   en          om         en
SFX Y   en          ím         en
SFX Y   en          a          en
SFX Y   en          é          en
SFX Y   en          u          en
SFX Y   en          ou         en
SFX Y   en          o          en
SFX Y   en          i          en
SFX Y   en          y          en
SFX Y   en          ěch        en
SFX Y   en          ěm         en
SFX Y   en          ěmi        en
SFX Y   en          ěma        en
SFX Y   do          oho        do
SFX Y   do          omu        do
SFX Y   do          om         do
SFX Y   do          ým         do
SFX Y   co          čeho       co
SFX Y   co          čemu       co
SFX Y   co          čem        co
SFX Y   co          čím        co
SFX Y   áš          ašeho      áš
SFX Y   áš          ašemu      áš
SFX Y   áš          ašem       áš
SFX Y   áš          aším       áš
SFX Y   áš          aše        áš
SFX Y   áš          aší        áš
SFX Y   áš          aši        áš
SFX Y   áš          ašich      áš
SFX Y   áš          ašim       áš
SFX Y   áš          ašimi      áš
SFX Y   áš          ašima      áš
SFX Y   ůj          ého        ůj
SFX Y   ůj          ému        ůj
SFX Y   ůj          ém         ůj
SFX Y   ůj          ým         ůj
SFX Y   ůj          á          ůj
SFX Y   ůj          oje        ůj
SFX Y   ůj          é          ůj
SFX Y   ůj          ojí        ůj
SFX Y   ůj          ou         ůj
SFX Y   ůj          oji        ůj
SFX Y   ůj          í          ůj
SFX Y   ůj          ých        ůj
SFX Y   ůj          ými        ůj
SFX Y   ůj          ýma        ůj
